Ohio, session 136, HB81.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio:
S 1. That sections 4121.12, 4121.121, 4121.13, 4123.44, 4123.52, 4123.54, 4123.57,
ECTION
4123.66, 4125.07, 4133.10, 4167.01, 4167.10, and 5145.163 of the Revised Code be amended to
read as follows:
Sec. 4121.12. (A) There is hereby created the bureau of workers' compensation board of
directors consisting of eleven members to be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent
of the senate. One member shall be an individual who, on account of the individual's previous
vocation, employment, or affiliations, can be classed as a representative of employees; two members
shall be individuals who, on account of their previous vocation, employment, or affiliations, can be
classed as representatives of employee organizations and at least one of these two individuals shall
be a member of the executive committee of the largest statewide labor federation; three members
shall be individuals who, on account of their previous vocation, employment, or affiliations, can be
classed as representatives of employers, one of whom represents self-insuring employers, one of
whom is a state fund employer who employs one hundred or more employees, and one of whom is a
state fund employer who employs less than one hundred employees; two members shall be
individuals who, on account of their vocation, employment, or affiliations, can be classed as
investment and securities experts who have direct experience in the management, analysis,
supervision, or investment of assets and are residents of this state; one member who shall be a
certified public accountant; one member who shall be an actuary who is a member in good standing
with the American academy of actuaries or who is an associate or fellow with the casualty actuarial
society; and one member shall represent the public and also be an individual who, on account of the
individual's previous vocation, employment, or affiliations, cannot be classed as either
predominantly representative of employees or of employers. The governor shall select the
chairperson of the board who shall serve as chairperson at the pleasure of the governor.
None of the members of the board, within one year immediately preceding the member's

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
2
appointment, shall have been employed by the bureau of workers' compensation or by any person,
partnership, or corporation that has provided to the bureau services of a financial or investment
nature, including the management, analysis, supervision, or investment of assets.
(B) Of the initial appointments made to the board, the governor shall appoint the member
who represents employees, one member who represents employers, and the member who represents
the public to a term ending one year after June 11, 2007; one member who represents employers,
one member who represents employee organizations, one member who is an investment and
securities expert, and the member who is a certified public accountant to a term ending two years
after June 11, 2007; and one member who represents employers, one member who represents
employee organizations, one member who is an investment and securities expert, and the member
who is an actuary to a term ending three years after June 11, 2007. Thereafter, terms of office shall
be for three years, with each term ending on the same day of the same month as did the term that it
succeeds. Each member shall hold office from the date of the member's appointment until the end of
the term for which the member was appointed.
Members may be reappointed. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the
expiration date of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office as a
member for the remainder of that term. A member shall continue in office subsequent to the
expiration date of the member's term until a successor takes office or until a period of sixty days has
elapsed, whichever occurs first.
(C) In making appointments to the board, the governor shall select the members from the list
of names submitted by the workers' compensation board of directors nominating committee pursuant
to this division. The nominating committee shall submit to the governor a list containing four
separate names for each of the members on the board. Within fourteen days after the submission of
the list, the governor shall appoint individuals from the list.
At least thirty days prior to a vacancy occurring as a result of the expiration of a term and
within thirty days after other vacancies occurring on the board, the nominating committee shall
submit an initial list containing four names for each vacancy. Within fourteen days after the
submission of the initial list, the governor either shall appoint individuals from that list or request the
nominating committee to submit another list of four names for each member the governor has not
appointed from the initial list, which list the nominating committee shall submit to the governor
within fourteen days after the governor's request. The governor then shall appoint, within seven days
after the submission of the second list, one of the individuals from either list to fill the vacancy for
which the governor has not made an appointment from the initial list. If the governor appoints an
individual to fill a vacancy occurring as a result of the expiration of a term, the individual appointed
shall begin serving as a member of the board when the term for which the individual's predecessor
was appointed expires or immediately upon appointment by the governor, whichever occurs later.
With respect to the filling of vacancies, the nominating committee shall provide the governor with a
list of four individuals who are, in the judgment of the nominating committee, the most fully

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
3
qualified to accede to membership on the board.
In order for the name of an individual to be submitted to the governor under this division, the
nominating committee shall approve the individual by an affirmative vote of a majority of its
members.
(D) All members of the board shall receive their reasonable and necessary expenses pursuant
to section 126.31 of the Revised Code while engaged in the performance of their duties as members
and also shall receive an annual salary not to exceed sixty thousand dollars in total, payable on the
following basis:
(1) Except as provided in division (D)(2) of this section, a member shall receive two
thousand five hundred dollars during a month in which the member attends one or more meetings of
the board and shall receive no payment during a month in which the member attends no meeting of
the board.
(2) A member may receive no more than thirty thousand dollars per year to compensate the
member for attending meetings of the board, regardless of the number of meetings held by the board
during a year or the number of meetings in excess of twelve within a year that the member attends.
(3) Except as provided in division (D)(4) of this section, if a member serves on the workers'
compensation audit committee, workers' compensation actuarial committee, or the workers'
compensation investment committee, the member shall receive two thousand five hundred dollars
during a month in which the member attends one or more meetings of the committee on which the
member serves and shall receive no payment during any month in which the member attends no
meeting of that committee.
(4) A member may receive no more than thirty thousand dollars per year to compensate the
member for attending meetings of any of the committees specified in division (D)(3) of this section,
regardless of the number of meetings held by a committee during a year or the number of
committees on which a member serves.
The chairperson of the board shall set the meeting dates of the board as necessary to perform
the duties of the board under this chapter and Chapters 4123., 4125., 4127., 4131., 4133., and 4167.
of the Revised Code. The board shall meet at least twelve times a year. The administrator of
workers' compensation shall provide professional and clerical assistance to the board, as the board
considers appropriate.
(E) Before entering upon the duties of office, each appointed member of the board shall take
an oath of office as required by sections 3.22 and 3.23 of the Revised Code and file in the office of
the secretary of state the bond required under section 4121.127 of the Revised Code.
(F) The board shall:
(1) Establish the overall administrative policy for the bureau for the purposes of this chapter
and Chapters 4123., 4125., 4127., 4131., 4133., and 4167. of the Revised Code;
(2) Review progress of the bureau in meeting its cost and quality objectives and in
complying with this chapter and Chapters 4123., 4125., 4127., 4131., 4133., and 4167. of the

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
4
Revised Code;
(3) Submit an annual report to the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of
representatives, and the governor and include all of the following in that report:
(a) An evaluation of the cost and quality objectives of the bureau;
(b) A statement of the net assets available for the provision of compensation and benefits
under this chapter and Chapters 4123., 4127., and 4131. of the Revised Code as of the last day of the
fiscal year;
(c) A statement of any changes that occurred in the net assets available, including employer
premiums and net investment income, for the provision of compensation and benefits and payment
of administrative expenses, between the first and last day of the fiscal year immediately preceding
the date of the report;
(d) The following information for each of the six consecutive fiscal years occurring previous
to the report:
(i) A schedule of the net assets available for compensation and benefits;
(ii) The annual cost of the payment of compensation and benefits;
(iii) Annual administrative expenses incurred;
(iv) Annual employer premiums allocated for the provision of compensation and benefits.
(e) A description of any significant changes that occurred during the six years for which the
board provided the information required under division (F)(3)(d) of this section that affect the ability
of the board to compare that information from year to year.
(4) Review all independent financial audits of the bureau. The administrator shall provide
access to records of the bureau to facilitate the review required under this division.
(5) Study issues as requested by the administrator or the governor;
(6) Contract with all of the following:
(a) An independent actuarial firm to assist the board in making recommendations to the
administrator regarding premium rates;
(b) An outside investment counsel to assist the workers' compensation investment committee
in fulfilling its duties;
(c) An independent fiduciary counsel to assist the board in the performance of its duties.
(7) Approve the investment policy developed by the workers' compensation investment
committee pursuant to section 4121.129 of the Revised Code if the policy satisfies the requirements
specified in section 4123.442 of the Revised Code;
(8) Review and publish the investment policy no less than annually and make copies
available to interested parties;
(9) Prohibit, on a prospective basis, any specific investment it finds to be contrary to the
investment policy approved by the board;
(10) Vote to open each investment class and allow the administrator to invest in an
investment class only if the board, by a majority vote, opens that class;

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
5
(11) After opening a class but prior to the administrator investing in that class, adopt rules
establishing due diligence standards for employees of the bureau to follow when investing in that
class and establish policies and procedures to review and monitor the performance and value of each
investment class;
(12) Submit a report annually on the performance and value of each investment class to the
governor, the president and minority leader of the senate, and the speaker and minority leader of the
house of representatives;
(13) Advise and consent on all of the following:
(a) Administrative rules the administrator submits to it pursuant to division (B)(5) of section
4121.121 of the Revised Code for the classification of occupations or industries, for premium rates
and contributions, for the amount to be credited to the surplus fund, for rules and systems of rating,
rate revisions, and merit rating;
(b) The duties and authority conferred upon the administrator pursuant to section 4121.37 of
the Revised Code;
(c) Rules the administrator adopts for the health partnership program and the qualified health
plan system, as provided in sections 4121.44, 4121.441, and 4121.442 of the Revised Code;
(d) Rules the administrator submits to it pursuant to Chapter 4167. of the Revised Code
regarding the public employment risk reduction program and the protection of public health care
workers from exposure incidents.
As used in this division, "public health care worker" and "exposure incident" have the same
meanings as in section 4167.25 of the Revised Code.
(14) Perform all duties required under this chapter and Chapters 4123., 4125., 4127., 4131.,
4133., and 4167. of the Revised Code;
(15) Meet with the governor on an annual basis to discuss the administrator's performance of
the duties specified in this chapter and Chapters 4123., 4125., 4127., 4131., 4133., and 4167. of the
Revised Code;
(16) Develop and participate in a bureau of workers' compensation board of directors
education program that consists of all of the following:
(a) An orientation component for newly appointed members;
(b) A continuing education component for board members who have served for at least one
year;
(c) A curriculum that includes education about each of the following topics:
(i) Board member duties and responsibilities;
(ii) Compensation and benefits paid pursuant to this chapter and Chapters 4123., 4127., and
4131. of the Revised Code;
(iii) Ethics;
(iv) Governance processes and procedures;
(v) Actuarial soundness;

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
6
(vi) Investments;
(vii) Any other subject matter the board believes is reasonably related to the duties of a
board member.
(17)(16) Hold all sessions, classes, and other events for the program developed pursuant to
division (F)(16)(F)(15) of this section in this state.
(G) The board may do both of the following:
(1) Vote to close any investment class;
(2) Create any committees in addition to the workers' compensation audit committee, the
workers' compensation actuarial committee, and the workers' compensation investment committee
that the board determines are necessary to assist the board in performing its duties.
(H) The office of a member of the board who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a felony, a
theft offense as defined in section 2913.01 of the Revised Code, or a violation of section 102.02,
102.03, 102.04, 2921.02, 2921.11, 2921.13, 2921.31, 2921.41, 2921.42, 2921.43, or 2921.44 of the
Revised Code shall be deemed vacant. The vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment. A person who has pleaded guilty to or been convicted of an offense of that nature is
ineligible to be a member of the board. A member who receives a bill of indictment for any of the
offenses specified in this section shall be automatically suspended from the board pending resolution
of the criminal matter.
(I) For the purposes of division (G)(1) of section 121.22 of the Revised Code, the meeting
between the governor and the board to review the administrator's performance as required under
division (F)(15) of this section shall be considered a meeting regarding the employment of the
administrator.Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in section 3.17 of the Revised Code, a
board member who fails to attend nine or more board meetings, including regular and special
meetings, during any consecutive twelve-month period forfeits the member's position on the board.
The resulting vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.
Sec. 4121.121. (A) There is hereby created the bureau of workers' compensation, which shall
be administered by the administrator of workers' compensation. A person appointed to the position
of administrator shall possess significant management experience in effectively managing an
organization or organizations of substantial size and complexity. A person appointed to the position
of administrator also shall possess a minimum of five years of experience in the field of workers'
compensation insurance or in another insurance industry, except as otherwise provided when the
conditions specified in division (C) of this section are satisfied. The governor shall appoint the
administrator as provided in section 121.03 of the Revised Code, and the administrator shall serve at
the pleasure of the governor. The governor shall fix the administrator's salary on the basis of the
administrator's experience and the administrator's responsibilities and duties under this chapter and
Chapters 4123., 4125., 4127., 4131., 4133., and 4167. of the Revised Code. The governor shall not
appoint to the position of administrator any person who has, or whose spouse has, given a
contribution to the campaign committee of the governor in an amount greater than one thousand

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
7
dollars during the two-year period immediately preceding the date of the appointment of the
administrator.
The administrator shall hold no other public office and shall devote full time to the duties of
administrator. Before entering upon the duties of the office, the administrator shall take an oath of
office as required by sections 3.22 and 3.23 of the Revised Code, and shall file in the office of the
secretary of state, a bond signed by the administrator and by surety approved by the governor, for
the sum of fifty thousand dollars payable to the state, conditioned upon the faithful performance of
the administrator's duties.
(B) The administrator is responsible for the management of the bureau and for the discharge
of all administrative duties imposed upon the administrator in this chapter and Chapters 4123.,
4125., 4127., 4131., 4133., and 4167. of the Revised Code, and in the discharge thereof shall do all
of the following:
(1) Perform all acts and exercise all authorities and powers, discretionary and otherwise that
are required of or vested in the bureau or any of its employees in this chapter and Chapters 4123.,
4125., 4127., 4131., 4133., and 4167. of the Revised Code, except the acts and the exercise of
authority and power that is required of and vested in the bureau of workers' compensation board of
directors or the industrial commission pursuant to those chapters. The treasurer of state shall honor
all warrants signed by the administrator, or by one or more of the administrator's employees,
authorized by the administrator in writing, or bearing the facsimile signature of the administrator or
such employee under sections 4123.42 and 4123.44 of the Revised Code.
(2) Employ, direct, and supervise all employees required in connection with the performance
of the duties assigned to the bureau by this chapter and Chapters 4123., 4125., 4127., 4131., 4133.,
and 4167. of the Revised Code, including an actuary, and may establish job classification plans and
compensation for all employees of the bureau provided that this grant of authority shall not be
construed as affecting any employee for whom the state employment relations board has established
an appropriate bargaining unit under section 4117.06 of the Revised Code. All positions of
employment in the bureau are in the classified civil service except those employees the administrator
may appoint to serve at the administrator's pleasure in the unclassified civil service pursuant to
section 124.11 of the Revised Code. The administrator shall fix the salaries of employees the
administrator appoints to serve at the administrator's pleasure, including the chief operating officer,
staff physicians, staff certified nurse-midwives, staff clinical nurse specialists, staff certified nurse
practitioners, and other senior management personnel of the bureau and shall establish the
compensation of staff attorneys of the bureau's legal section and their immediate supervisors, and
take whatever steps are necessary to provide adequate compensation for other staff attorneys.
The administrator may appoint a person who holds a certified position in the classified
service within the bureau to a position in the unclassified service within the bureau. A person
appointed pursuant to this division to a position in the unclassified service shall retain the right to
resume the position and status held by the person in the classified service immediately prior to the

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
8
person's appointment in the unclassified service, regardless of the number of positions the person
held in the unclassified service. An employee's right to resume a position in the classified service
may only be exercised when the administrator demotes the employee to a pay range lower than the
employee's current pay range or revokes the employee's appointment to the unclassified service. An
employee who holds a position in the classified service and who is appointed to a position in the
unclassified service on or after January 1, 2016, shall have the right to resume a position in the
classified service under this division only within five years after the effective date of the employee's
appointment in the unclassified service. An employee forfeits the right to resume a position in the
classified service when the employee is removed from the position in the unclassified service due to
incompetence, inefficiency, dishonesty, drunkenness, immoral conduct, insubordination,
discourteous treatment of the public, neglect of duty, violation of this chapter or Chapter 124., 4123.,
4125., 4127., 4131., 4133., or 4167. of the Revised Code, violation of the rules of the director of
administrative services or the administrator, any other failure of good behavior, any other acts of
misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance in office, or conviction of a felony while employed in the
civil service. An employee also forfeits the right to resume a position in the classified service upon
transfer to a different agency.
Reinstatement to a position in the classified service shall be to a position substantially equal
to that position in the classified service held previously, as certified by the department of
administrative services. If the position the person previously held in the classified service has been
placed in the unclassified service or is otherwise unavailable, the person shall be appointed to a
position in the classified service within the bureau that the director of administrative services
certifies is comparable in compensation to the position the person previously held in the classified
service. Service in the position in the unclassified service shall be counted as service in the position
in the classified service held by the person immediately prior to the person's appointment in the
unclassified service. When a person is reinstated to a position in the classified service as provided in
this division, the person is entitled to all rights, status, and benefits accruing to the position during
the person's time of service in the position in the unclassified service.
(3) Reorganize the work of the bureau, its sections, departments, and offices to the extent
necessary to achieve the most efficient performance of its functions and to that end may establish,
change, or abolish positions and assign and reassign duties and responsibilities of every employee of
the bureau. All persons employed by the commission in positions that, after November 3, 1989, are
supervised and directed by the administrator under this section are transferred to the bureau in their
respective classifications but subject to reassignment and reclassification of position and
compensation as the administrator determines to be in the interest of efficient administration. The
civil service status of any person employed by the commission is not affected by this section.
Personnel employed by the bureau or the commission who are subject to Chapter 4117. of the
Revised Code shall retain all of their rights and benefits conferred pursuant to that chapter as it
presently exists or is hereafter amended and nothing in this chapter or Chapter 4123. of the Revised

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
9
Code shall be construed as eliminating or interfering with Chapter 4117. of the Revised Code or the
rights and benefits conferred under that chapter to public employees or to any bargaining unit.
(4) Provide offices, equipment, supplies, and other facilities for the bureau.
(5) Prepare and submit to the board information the administrator considers pertinent or the
board requires, together with the administrator's recommendations, in the form of administrative
rules, for the advice and consent of the board, for classifications of occupations or industries, for
premium rates and contributions, for the amount to be credited to the surplus fund, for rules and
systems of rating, rate revisions, and merit rating. The administrator shall obtain, prepare, and
submit any other information the board requires for the prompt and efficient discharge of its duties.
(6) Keep the accounts required by division (A) of section 4123.34 of the Revised Code and
all other accounts and records necessary to the collection, administration, and distribution of the
workers' compensation funds and shall obtain the statistical and other information required by
section 4123.19 of the Revised Code.
(7) Exercise the investment powers vested in the administrator by section 4123.44 of the
Revised Code in accordance with the investment policy approved by the board pursuant to section
4121.12 of the Revised Code and in consultation with the chief investment officer of the bureau of
workers' compensation. The administrator shall not engage in any prohibited investment activity
specified by the board pursuant to division (F)(9) of section 4121.12 of the Revised Code and shall
not invest in any type of investment specified in divisions (B)(1) to (10) of section 4123.442 of the
Revised Code. All business shall be transacted, all funds invested, all warrants for money drawn and
payments made, and all cash and securities and other property held, in the name of the bureau, or in
the name of its nominee, provided that nominees are authorized by the administrator solely for the
purpose of facilitating the transfer of securities, and restricted to the administrator and designated
employees.
(8) In accordance with Chapter 125. of the Revised Code, purchase supplies, materials,
equipment, and services.
(9) Prepare and submit to the board an annual budget for internal operating purposes for the
board's approval. The administrator also shall, separately from the budget the industrial commission
submits, prepare and submit to the director of budget and management a budget for each biennium.
The budgets budget submitted to the board and the director shall include estimates of the costs and
necessary expenditures of the bureau in the discharge of any duty imposed by law.
(10) As promptly as possible in the course of efficient administration, decentralize and
relocate such of the personnel and activities of the bureau as is appropriate to the end that the
receipt, investigation, determination, and payment of claims may be undertaken at or near the place
of injury or the residence of the claimant and for that purpose establish regional offices, in such
places as the administrator considers proper, capable of discharging as many of the functions of the
bureau as is practicable so as to promote prompt and efficient administration in the processing of
claims. All active and inactive lost-time claims files shall be held at the service office responsible for

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
10
the claim. A claimant, at the claimant's request, shall be provided with information by telephone as
to the location of the file pertaining to the claimant's claim. The administrator shall ensure that all
service office employees report directly to the director for their service office.
(11) Provide a written binder on new coverage where the administrator considers it to be in
the best interest of the risk. The administrator, or any other person authorized by the administrator,
shall grant the binder upon submission of a request for coverage by the employer. A binder is
effective for a period of thirty days from date of issuance and is nonrenewable. Payroll reports and
premium charges shall coincide with the effective date of the binder.
(12) Set standards for the reasonable and maximum handling time of claims payment
functions, ensure, by rules, the impartial and prompt treatment of all claims and employer risk
accounts, and establish a secure, accurate method of time stamping all incoming mail and documents
hand delivered to bureau employees.
(13) Ensure that all employees of the bureau follow the orders and rules of the commission
as such orders and rules relate to the commission's overall adjudicatory policy-making and
management duties under this chapter and Chapters 4123., 4127., and 4131. of the Revised Code.
(14) Manage and operate a data processing system with a common data base for the use of
both the bureau and the commission and, in consultation with the commission, using electronic data
processing equipment, shall develop a claims tracking system that is sufficient to monitor the status
of a claim at any time and that lists appeals that have been filed and orders or determinations that
have been issued pursuant to section 4123.511 or 4123.512 of the Revised Code, including the dates
of such filings and issuances.
(15) Establish and maintain a medical section within the bureau. The medical section shall
do all of the following:
(a) Assist the administrator in establishing standard medical fees, approving medical
procedures, and determining eligibility and reasonableness of the compensation payments for
medical, hospital, and nursing services, and in establishing guidelines for payment policies which
recognize usual, customary, and reasonable methods of payment for covered services;
(b) Provide a resource to respond to questions from claims examiners for employees of the
bureau;
(c) Audit fee bill payments;
(d) Implement a program to utilize, to the maximum extent possible, electronic data
processing equipment for storage of information to facilitate authorizations of compensation
payments for medical, hospital, drug, and nursing services;
(e) Perform other duties assigned to it by the administrator.
(16) Appoint, as the administrator determines necessary, panels to review and advise the
administrator on disputes arising over a determination that a health care service or supply provided
to a claimant is not covered under this chapter or Chapter 4123., 4127., or 4131. of the Revised Code
or is medically unnecessary. If an individual health care provider is involved in the dispute, the panel

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
11
shall consist of individuals licensed pursuant to the same section of the Revised Code as such health
care provider.
(17) Pursuant to section 4123.65 of the Revised Code, approve applications for the final
settlement of claims for compensation or benefits under this chapter and Chapters 4123., 4127., and
4131. of the Revised Code as the administrator determines appropriate, except in regard to the
applications of self-insuring employers and their employees.
(18) Comply with section 3517.13 of the Revised Code, and except in regard to contracts
entered into pursuant to the authority contained in section 4121.44 of the Revised Code, comply
with the competitive bidding procedures set forth in the Revised Code for all contracts into which
the administrator enters provided that those contracts fall within the type of contracts and dollar
amounts specified in the Revised Code for competitive bidding and further provided that those
contracts are not otherwise specifically exempt from the competitive bidding procedures contained
in the Revised Code.
(19) Adopt, with the advice and consent of the board, rules for the operation of the bureau.
(20) Prepare and submit to the board information the administrator considers pertinent or the
board requires, together with the administrator's recommendations, in the form of administrative
rules, for the advice and consent of the board, for the health partnership program and the qualified
health plan system, as provided in sections 4121.44, 4121.441, and 4121.442 of the Revised Code.
(C) The administrator, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint a chief
operating officer who has a minimum of five years of experience in the field of workers'
compensation insurance or in another similar insurance industry if the administrator does not possess
such experience. The chief operating officer shall not commence the chief operating officer's duties
until after the senate consents to the chief operating officer's appointment. The chief operating
officer shall serve in the unclassified civil service of the state.
Sec. 4121.13. The administrator of workers' compensation shall:
(A) Investigate, ascertain, and declare and prescribe what hours of labor, safety devices,
safeguards, or other means or methods of protection are best adapted to render the employees of
every employment and place of employment and frequenters of every place of employment safe, and
to protect their welfare as required by law or lawful orders, and establish and maintain museums of
safety and hygiene in which shall be exhibited safety devices, safeguards, and other means and
methods for the protection of life, health, safety, and welfare of employees;
(B) Ascertain and fix reasonable standards and prescribe, modify, and enforce reasonable
orders for the adoption of safety devices, safeguards, and other means or methods of protection to be
as nearly uniform as possible as may be necessary to carry out all laws and lawful orders relative to
the protection of the life, health, safety, and welfare of employees in employments and places of
employment or frequenters of places of employment;
(C) Ascertain, fix, and order reasonable standards for the construction, repair, and
maintenance of places of employment as shall render them safe;

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
12
(D) Investigate, ascertain, and determine reasonable classifications of persons, employments,
and places of employment as are necessary to carry out the applicable sections of sections 4101.01
to 4101.16 and 4121.01 to 4121.29 of the Revised Code;
(E) Adopt reasonable and proper rules relative to the exercise of his the administrator's
powers and authorities, and proper rules to govern his the administrator's proceedings and to regulate
the mode and manner of all investigations and hearings, which rules shall not be effective until ten
days after their publication; a copy of the rules shall be delivered at cost to every citizen making
application therefor;
(F) Investigate all cases of fraud or other illegalities pertaining to the operation of the
workers' compensation system and its several insurance funds and for that purpose, the administrator
has every power of an inquisitorial nature granted to the industrial commission in this chapter and
Chapter 4123. of the Revised Code;
(G) Do all things convenient and necessary to accomplish the purposes directed in sections
4101.01 to 4101.16 and 4121.01 to 4121.28 of the Revised Code;
(H) Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede section 4105.011 of the Revised
Code in particular, or Chapter 4105. of the Revised Code in general.
Sec. 4123.44. The members of the bureau of workers' compensation board of directors, the
administrator of workers' compensation, and the bureau of workers' compensation chief investment
officer are the trustees of fiduciaries to the state insurance fund. The administrator, in accordance
with sections 4121.126 and 4121.127 of the Revised Code and the investment policy approved by
the board pursuant to section 4121.12 of the Revised Code, and in consultation with the bureau of
workers' compensation chief investment officer, may invest any of the surplus or reserve belonging
to the state insurance fund. The administrator and the bureau of workers' compensation chief
investment officer shall not deviate from the investment policy approved by the board without the
approval of the workers' compensation investment committee and the board.
The administrator shall not invest in any type of investment specified in divisions (B)(1) to
(10) of section 4123.442 of the Revised Code. The administrator shall not make an investment
decision with the primary purpose of influencing any social or environmental policy or attempting to
influence the governance of any corporation.
The administrator and other fiduciaries shall discharge their duties with respect to the funds
with the care, skill, prudence, and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent
person acting in a like capacity and familiar with such matters would use in the conduct of an
enterprise of a like character and with like aims, and by diversifying the investments of the assets of
the funds so as to minimize the risk of large losses, unless under the circumstances it is clearly
prudent not to do so.
The administrator and other fiduciaries, in accordance with their fiduciary duties described
under this section, shall make investment decisions with the sole purpose of maximizing the return
on investments and that are consistent with any other fiduciary responsibilities of the administrator

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
13
and other fiduciaries under this chapter and Chapters 4121., 4127., and 4131. of the Revised Code.
To facilitate investment of the funds, the administrator may establish a partnership, trust,
limited liability company, corporation, including a corporation exempt from taxation under the
Internal Revenue Code, 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended, or any other legal entity authorized
to transact business in this state.
When reporting on the performance of investments, the administrator shall comply with the
performance presentation standards established by the association for investment management and
research.
All investments shall be purchased at current market prices and the evidences of title to the
investments shall be placed in the custody of the treasurer of state, who is hereby designated as
custodian, or in the custody of the treasurer of state's authorized agent. Evidences of title of the
investments so purchased may be deposited by the treasurer of state for safekeeping with an
authorized agent selected by the treasurer of state who is a qualified trustee under section 135.18 of
the Revised Code. The treasurer of state or the agent shall collect the principal, dividends,
distributions, and interest as they become due and payable and place them when collected into the
state insurance fund.
The treasurer of state shall pay for investments purchased by the administrator on receipt of
written or electronic instructions from the administrator or the administrator's designated agent
authorizing the purchase, and pending receipt of the evidence of title of the investment by the
treasurer of state or the treasurer of state's authorized agent. The administrator may sell investments
held by the administrator, and the treasurer of state or the treasurer of state's authorized agent shall
accept payment from the purchaser and deliver evidence of title of the investment to the purchaser,
on receipt of written or electronic instructions from the administrator or the administrator's
designated agent authorizing the sale, and pending receipt of the moneys for the investments. The
amount received shall be placed in the state insurance fund. The administrator and the treasurer of
state may enter into agreements to establish procedures for the purchase and sale of investments
under this division and the custody of the investments.
No purchase or sale of any investment shall be made under this section, except as authorized
by the administrator.
Any statement of financial position distributed by the administrator shall include the fair
value, as of the statement date, of all investments held by the administrator under this section.
When in the judgment of the administrator it is necessary to provide available funds for the
payment of compensation or benefits under this chapter, the administrator may borrow money from
any available source and pledge as security a sufficient amount of bonds or other securities in which
the state insurance fund is invested. The aggregate unpaid amount of loans existing at any one time
for money so borrowed shall not exceed ten million dollars. The bonds or other securities so pledged
as security for such loans to the administrator shall be the sole security for the payment of the
principal and interest of any such loan. The administrator shall not be personally liable for the

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
14
payment of the principal or the interest of any such loan. No such loan shall be made for a longer
period of time than one year. Such loans may be renewed but no one renewal shall be for a period in
excess of one year. Such loans shall bear such rate of interest as the administrator determines and in
negotiating the loans, the administrator shall endeavor to secure as favorable interest rates and terms
as circumstances will permit.
The treasurer of state may deliver to the person or governmental agency making such loan,
the bonds or other securities which are to be pledged by the administrator as security for such loan,
upon receipt by the treasurer of state of an order of the administrator authorizing such loan. Upon
payment of any such loan by the administrator, the bonds or other securities pledged as security
therefor shall be returned to the treasurer of state as custodian of such bonds.
The administrator may pledge with the treasurer of state such amount of bonds or other
securities in which the state insurance fund is invested as is reasonably necessary as security for any
certificates issued, or paid out, by the treasurer of state upon any warrants drawn by the
administrator.
The administrator may secure investment information services, consulting services, and
other like services to facilitate investment of the surplus and reserve belonging to the state insurance
fund. The administrator shall pay the expense of securing such services from the state insurance
fund.
The board and administrator shall not take any action to promote a policy under which the
administrator makes investment decisions with the primary purpose of influencing any social or
environmental policy or attempting to influence the governance of any corporation.
Sec. 4123.52. (A) The jurisdiction of the industrial commission and the authority of the
administrator of workers' compensation over each case is continuing, and the commission may make
such modification or change with respect to former findings or orders with respect thereto, as, in its
opinion is justified. No modification or change nor any finding or award in respect of any claim shall
be made with respect to disability, compensation, dependency, or benefits, after five years from the
date of injury in the absence of medical benefits being provided under this chapter or in the absence
of payment of compensation under section 4123.57, 4123.58, or division (A) or (B) of section
4123.56 of the Revised Code or wages in lieu of compensation in a manner so as to satisfy the
requirements of section 4123.84 of the Revised Code, in which event the modification, change,
finding, or award shall be made within five years from the date of the last medical services being
rendered or the date of the last payment of compensation or from the date of death, nor unless
written notice of claim for the specific part or parts of the body injured or disabled has been given as
provided in section 4123.84 or 4123.85 of the Revised Code. The commission shall not make any
modification, change, finding, or award which shall award compensation for a back period in excess
of two years prior to the date of filing application therefor.
(B)(B)(1) As used in this division, "prosthetic device" means a custom fabricated or fitted
device used to replace a missing appendage or other external body part. "Prosthetic device" includes

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
15
an artificial limb, hand, foot, or eye or an intraocular lens. "Prosthetic device" does not include a
dental appliance, eyeglasses, hearing aid, ostomy product, or any other item that does not have a
significant impact on the musculoskeletal functions of the body such as breast prostheses, eyelashes,
wigs, and other cosmetic devices.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in division (A) of this section, the
commission or administrator may, regardless of the date of injury or the last payment of
compensation or benefits, order payment to purchase, repair, or replace a prosthetic device if the
purchase, repair, or replacement is necessary due to an amputation or loss that resulted from an
allowed injury or occupational disease.
(3) Ordering a payment under division (B)(2) of this section does not extend the time period
during which the commission or administrator may modify or change a former finding or order in a
claim as provided under division (A) of this section.
(C) Notwithstanding division (A) of this section, and except as otherwise provided in a rule
that shall be adopted by the administrator, with the advice and consent of the bureau of workers'
compensation board of directors, neither the administrator nor the commission shall make any
finding or award for payment of medical or vocational rehabilitation services submitted for payment
more than one year after the date the services were rendered or more than one year after the date the
services became payable under division (I) of section 4123.511 of the Revised Code, whichever is
later. No medical or vocational rehabilitation provider shall bill a claimant for services rendered if
the administrator or commission is prohibited from making that payment under this division.
(C)(D) Division (B)(C) of this section does not apply to requests made by the centers for
medicare and medicaid services in the United States department of health and human services for
reimbursement of conditional payments made pursuant to section 1395y(b)(2) of title 42, United
States Code (commonly known as the "Medicare Secondary Payer Act").
(D)(E) This section does not affect the right of a claimant to compensation accruing
subsequent to the filing of any such application, provided the application is filed within the time
limit provided in this section.
(E)(F) This section does not deprive the commission of its continuing jurisdiction to
determine the questions raised by any application for modification of award which has been filed
with the commission after June 1, 1932, and prior to the expiration of the applicable period but in
respect to which no award has been granted or denied during the applicable period.
(F)(G) The commission may, by general rules, provide for the destruction of files of cases in
which no further action may be taken.
(G)(H) The commission and administrator of workers' compensation each may, by general
rules, provide for the retention and destruction of all other records in their possession or under their
control pursuant to section 121.211 and sections 149.34 to 149.36 of the Revised Code. The bureau
of workers' compensation may purchase or rent required equipment for the document retention
media, as determined necessary to preserve the records. Photographs, microphotographs, microfilm,

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
16
films, or other direct or electronic document retention media, when properly identified, have the
same effect as the original record and may be offered in like manner and may be received as
evidence in proceedings before the industrial commission, staff hearing officers, and district hearing
officers, and in any court where the original record could have been introduced.
Sec. 4123.54. (A) Except as otherwise provided in this division or divisions (I) and (K) of
this section, every employee, who is injured or who contracts an occupational disease, and the
dependents of each employee who is killed, or dies as the result of an occupational disease
contracted in the course of employment, wherever the injury has occurred or occupational disease
has been contracted, is entitled to receive the compensation for loss sustained on account of the
injury, occupational disease, or death, and the medical, nurse, and hospital services and medicines,
and the amount of funeral expenses in case of death, as are provided by this chapter. The
compensation and benefits shall be provided, as applicable, directly from the employee's self-
insuring employer as provided in section 4123.35 of the Revised Code or from the state insurance
fund. An employee or dependent is not entitled to receive compensation or benefits under this
division if the employee's injury or occupational disease is either of the following:
(1) Purposely self-inflicted;
(2) Caused by the employee being intoxicated, under the influence of a controlled substance
not prescribed by a physician, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse
practitioner, or under the influence of marihuana if being intoxicated, under the influence of a
controlled substance not prescribed by a physician, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist,
or certified nurse practitioner, or under the influence of marihuana was the proximate cause of the
injury.
(B) For the purpose of this section, provided that an employer has posted written notice to
employees that the results of, or the employee's refusal to submit to, any chemical test described
under this division may affect the employee's eligibility for compensation and benefits pursuant to
this chapter and Chapter 4121. of the Revised Code, there is a rebuttable presumption that an
employee is intoxicated, under the influence of a controlled substance not prescribed by the
employee's physician, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse
practitioner, or under the influence of marihuana and that being intoxicated, under the influence of a
controlled substance not prescribed by the employee's physician, certified nurse-midwife, clinical
nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner, or under the influence of marihuana is the proximate
cause of an injury under either of the following conditions:
(1) When any one or more of the following is true:
(a) The employee, through a qualifying chemical test administered within eight hours of an
injury, is determined to have an alcohol concentration level equal to or in excess of the levels
established in divisions (A)(1)(b) to (i) of section 4511.19 of the Revised Code.
(b) The employee, through a qualifying chemical test administered within thirty-two hours of
an injury, is determined to have a controlled substance not prescribed by the employee's physician,

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
17
certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner or marihuana in the
employee's system at a level equal to or in excess of the cutoff concentration level for the particular
substance as provided in section 40.87 40.85 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, 49
C.F.R. 40.8740.85, as amendedit existed on January 1, 2024, or as subsequently amended as a result
of a statute or rule.
(c) The employee, through a qualifying chemical test administered within thirty-two hours of
an injury, is determined to have barbiturates, benzodiazepines, or methadone in the employee's
system that tests above levels established by laboratories certified by the United States department of
health and human services.
(2) When the employee refuses to submit to a requested chemical test, on the condition that
that employee is or was given notice that the refusal to submit to any chemical test described in
division (B)(1) of this section may affect the employee's eligibility for compensation and benefits
under this chapter and Chapter 4121. of the Revised Code.
(C)(1) For purposes of division (B) of this section, a chemical test is a qualifying chemical
test if it is administered to an employee after an injury under at least one of the following conditions:
(a) When the employee's employer had reasonable cause to suspect that the employee may
be intoxicated, under the influence of a controlled substance not prescribed by the employee's
physician, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist, or certified nurse practitioner, or under
the influence of marihuana;
(b) At the request of a police officer pursuant to section 4511.191 of the Revised Code, and
not at the request of the employee's employer;
(c) At the request of a licensed physician, certified nurse-midwife, clinical nurse specialist,
or certified nurse practitioner who is not employed by the employee's employer, and not at the
request of the employee's employer.
(2) As used in division (C)(1)(a) of this section, "reasonable cause" means, but is not limited
to, evidence that an employee is or was using alcohol, a controlled substance, or marihuana drawn
from specific, objective facts and reasonable inferences drawn from these facts in light of experience
and training. These facts and inferences may be based on, but are not limited to, any of the
following:
(a) Observable phenomena, such as direct observation of use, possession, or distribution of
alcohol, a controlled substance, or marihuana, or of the physical symptoms of being under the
influence of alcohol, a controlled substance, or marihuana, such as but not limited to slurred speech;
dilated pupils; odor of alcohol, a controlled substance, or marihuana; changes in affect; or dynamic
mood swings;
(b) A pattern of abnormal conduct, erratic or aberrant behavior, or deteriorating work
performance such as frequent absenteeism, excessive tardiness, or recurrent accidents, that appears
to be related to the use of alcohol, a controlled substance, or marihuana, and does not appear to be
attributable to other factors;

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
18
(c) The identification of an employee as the focus of a criminal investigation into
unauthorized possession, use, or trafficking of a controlled substance or marihuana;
(d) A report of use of alcohol, a controlled substance, or marihuana provided by a reliable
and credible source;
(e) Repeated or flagrant violations of the safety or work rules of the employee's employer,
that are determined by the employee's supervisor to pose a substantial risk of physical injury or
property damage and that appear to be related to the use of alcohol, a controlled substance, or
marihuana and that do not appear attributable to other factors.
(D) Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the rights of an employer to test
employees for alcohol or controlled substance abuse.
(E) For the purpose of this section, laboratories certified by the United States department of
health and human services or laboratories that meet or exceed the standards of that department for
laboratory certification shall be used for processing the test results of a qualifying chemical test.
(F) The written notice required by division (B) of this section shall be the same size or larger
than the proof of workers' compensation coverage furnished by the bureau of workers' compensation
and shall be posted by the employer in the same location as the proof of workers' compensation
coverage or the certificate of self-insurance.
(G) If a condition that pre-existed an injury is substantially aggravated by the injury, and that
substantial aggravation is documented by objective diagnostic findings, objective clinical findings,
or objective test results, no compensation or benefits are payable because of the pre-existing
condition once that condition has returned to a level that would have existed without the injury.
(H)(1) Whenever, with respect to an employee of an employer who is subject to and has
complied with this chapter, there is possibility of conflict with respect to the application of workers'
compensation laws because the contract of employment is entered into and all or some portion of the
work is or is to be performed in a state or states other than Ohio, the employer and the employee
may agree to be bound by the laws of this state or by the laws of some other state in which all or
some portion of the work of the employee is to be performed. The agreement shall be in writing and
shall be filed with the bureau of workers' compensation within ten days after it is executed and shall
remain in force until terminated or modified by agreement of the parties similarly filed. If the
agreement is to be bound by the laws of this state and the employer has complied with this chapter,
then the employee is entitled to compensation and benefits regardless of where the injury occurs or
the disease is contracted and the rights of the employee and the employee's dependents under the
laws of this state are the exclusive remedy against the employer on account of injury, disease, or
death in the course of and arising out of the employee's employment. If the agreement is to be bound
by the laws of another state and the employer has complied with the laws of that state, the rights of
the employee and the employee's dependents under the laws of that state are the exclusive remedy
against the employer on account of injury, disease, or death in the course of and arising out of the
employee's employment without regard to the place where the injury was sustained or the disease

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
19
contracted. If an employer and an employee enter into an agreement under this division, the fact that
the employer and the employee entered into that agreement shall not be construed to change the
status of an employee whose continued employment is subject to the will of the employer or the
employee, unless the agreement contains a provision that expressly changes that status.
(2) If an employee or the employee's dependents receive an award of compensation or
benefits under this chapter or Chapter 4121., 4127., or 4131. of the Revised Code for the same
injury, occupational disease, or death for which the employee or the employee's dependents
previously pursued or otherwise elected to accept workers' compensation benefits and received a
decision on the merits as defined in section 4123.542 of the Revised Code under the laws of another
state or recovered damages under the laws of another state, the claim shall be disallowed and the
administrator or any self-insuring employer, by any lawful means, may collect from the employee or
the employee's dependents any of the following:
(a) The amount of compensation or benefits paid to or on behalf of the employee or the
employee's dependents by the administrator or a self-insuring employer pursuant to this chapter or
Chapter 4121., 4127., or 4131. of the Revised Code for that award;
(b) Any interest, attorney's fees, and costs the administrator or the self-insuring employer
incurs in collecting that payment.
(3) If an employee or the employee's dependents receive an award of compensation or
benefits under this chapter or Chapter 4121., 4127., or 4131. of the Revised Code and subsequently
pursue or otherwise elect to accept workers' compensation benefits or damages under the laws of
another state for the same injury, occupational disease, or death the claim under this chapter or
Chapter 4121., 4127., or 4131. of the Revised Code shall be disallowed. The administrator or a self-
insuring employer, by any lawful means, may collect from the employee or the employee's
dependents or other-states' insurer any of the following:
(a) The amount of compensation or benefits paid to or on behalf of the employee or the
employee's dependents by the administrator or the self-insuring employer pursuant to this chapter or
Chapter 4121., 4127., or 4131. of the Revised Code for that award;
(b) Any interest, costs, and attorney's fees the administrator or the self-insuring employer
incurs in collecting that payment;
(c) Any costs incurred by an employer in contesting or responding to any claim filed by the
employee or the employee's dependents for the same injury, occupational disease, or death that was
filed after the original claim for which the employee or the employee's dependents received a
decision on the merits as described in section 4123.542 of the Revised Code.
(4) If the employee's employer pays premiums into the state insurance fund, the
administrator shall not charge the amount of compensation or benefits the administrator collects
pursuant to division (H)(2) or (3) of this section to the employer's experience. If the administrator
collects any costs incurred by an employer in contesting or responding to any claim pursuant to
division (H)(2) or (3) of this section, the administrator shall forward the amount collected to that

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
20
employer. If the employee's employer is a self-insuring employer, the self-insuring employer shall
deduct the amount of compensation or benefits the self-insuring employer collects pursuant to this
division from the paid compensation the self-insuring employer reports to the administrator under
division (L) of section 4123.35 of the Revised Code.
(5) If an employee is a resident of a state other than this state and is insured under the
workers' compensation law or similar laws of a state other than this state, the employee and the
employee's dependents are not entitled to receive compensation or benefits under this chapter, on
account of injury, disease, or death arising out of or in the course of employment while temporarily
within this state, and the rights of the employee and the employee's dependents under the laws of the
other state are the exclusive remedy against the employer on account of the injury, disease, or death.
(6) An employee, or the dependent of an employee, who elects to receive compensation and
benefits under this chapter or Chapter 4121., 4127., or 4131. of the Revised Code for a claim may
not receive compensation and benefits under the workers' compensation laws of any state other than
this state for that same claim. For each claim submitted by or on behalf of an employee, the
administrator or, if the employee is employed by a self-insuring employer, the self-insuring
employer, shall request the employee or the employee's dependent to sign an election that affirms
the employee's or employee's dependent's acceptance of electing to receive compensation and
benefits under this chapter or Chapter 4121., 4127., or 4131. of the Revised Code for that claim that
also affirmatively waives and releases the employee's or the employee's dependent's right to file for
and receive compensation and benefits under the laws of any state other than this state for that claim.
The employee or employee's dependent shall sign the election form within twenty-eight days after
the administrator or self-insuring employer submits the request or the administrator or self-insuring
employer shall dismiss that claim.
In the event a workers' compensation claim has been filed in another jurisdiction on behalf of
an employee or the dependents of an employee, and the employee or dependents subsequently elect
to receive compensation, benefits, or both under this chapter or Chapter 4121., 4127., or 4131. of the
Revised Code, the employee or dependent shall withdraw or refuse acceptance of the workers'
compensation claim filed in the other jurisdiction in order to pursue compensation or benefits under
the laws of this state. If the employee or dependents were awarded workers' compensation benefits
or had recovered damages under the laws of the other state, any compensation and benefits awarded
under this chapter or Chapter 4121., 4127., or 4131. of the Revised Code shall be paid only to the
extent to which those payments exceed the amounts paid under the laws of the other state. If the
employee or dependent fails to withdraw or to refuse acceptance of the workers' compensation claim
in the other jurisdiction within twenty-eight days after a request made by the administrator or a self-
insuring employer, the administrator or self-insuring employer shall dismiss the employee's or
employee's dependents' claim made in this state.
(I) If an employee who is covered under the federal "Longshore and Harbor Workers'
Compensation Act," 98 Stat. 1639, 33 U.S.C. 901 et seq., is injured or contracts an occupational

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
21
disease or dies as a result of an injury or occupational disease, and if that employee's or that
employee's dependents' claim for compensation or benefits for that injury, occupational disease, or
death is subject to the jurisdiction of that act, the employee or the employee's dependents are not
entitled to apply for and shall not receive compensation or benefits under this chapter and Chapter
4121. of the Revised Code. The rights of such an employee and the employee's dependents under the
federal "Longshore and Harbor Workers' Compensation Act," 98 Stat. 1639, 33 U.S.C. 901 et seq.,
are the exclusive remedy against the employer for that injury, occupational disease, or death.
(J) Compensation or benefits are not payable to a claimant or a dependent during the period
of confinement of the claimant or dependent in any state or federal correctional institution, or in any
county jail in lieu of incarceration in a state or federal correctional institution, whether in this or any
other state for conviction of violation of any state or federal criminal law.
(K) An employer, upon the approval of the administrator, may provide for workers'
compensation coverage for the employer's employees who are professional athletes and coaches by
submitting to the administrator proof of coverage under a league policy issued under the laws of
another state under either of the following circumstances:
(1) The employer administers the payroll and workers' compensation insurance for a
professional sports team subject to a collective bargaining agreement, and the collective bargaining
agreement provides for the uniform administration of workers' compensation benefits and
compensation for professional athletes.
(2) The employer is a professional sports league, or is a member team of a professional
sports league, and all of the following apply:
(a) The professional sports league operates as a single entity, whereby all of the players and
coaches of the sports league are employees of the sports league and not of the individual member
teams.
(b) The professional sports league at all times maintains workers' compensation insurance
that provides coverage for the players and coaches of the sports league.
(c) Each individual member team of the professional sports league, pursuant to the
organizational or operating documents of the sports league, is obligated to the sports league to pay to
the sports league any workers' compensation claims that are not covered by the workers'
compensation insurance maintained by the sports league.
If the administrator approves the employer's proof of coverage submitted under division (K)
of this section, a professional athlete or coach who is an employee of the employer and the
dependents of the professional athlete or coach are not entitled to apply for and shall not receive
compensation or benefits under this chapter and Chapter 4121. of the Revised Code. The rights of
such an athlete or coach and the dependents of such an athlete or coach under the laws of the state
where the policy was issued are the exclusive remedy against the employer for the athlete or coach if
the athlete or coach suffers an injury or contracts an occupational disease in the course of
employment, or for the dependents of the athlete or the coach if the athlete or coach is killed as a

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
22
result of an injury or dies as a result of an occupational disease, regardless of the location where the
injury was suffered or the occupational disease was contracted.
Sec. 4123.57. Partial disability compensation shall be paid as follows.
Except as provided in this section, not earlier than twenty-six weeks after the date of
termination of the latest period of payments under section 4123.56 of the Revised Code or twenty-
six weeks after the termination of wages in lieu of those payments, or not earlier than twenty-six
weeks after the date of the injury or contraction of an occupational disease in the absence of
payments under section 4123.56 of the Revised Code or wages in lieu of those payments, the
employee may file an application with the bureau of workers' compensation for the determination of
the percentage of the employee's permanent partial disability resulting from an injury or
occupational disease.
Whenever the application is filed, the bureau shall send a copy of the application to the
employee's employer or the employer's representative and shall schedule the employee for a medical
examination by the bureau medical section. The bureau shall send a copy of the report of the medical
examination to the employee, the employer, and their representatives. Thereafter, the administrator
of workers' compensation shall review the employee's claim file and make a tentative order as the
evidence before the administrator at the time of the making of the order warrants. If the
administrator determines that there is a conflict of evidence, the administrator shall send the
application, along with the claimant's file, to the district hearing officer who shall set the application
for a hearing.
If an employee fails to respond to an attempt to schedule a medical examination by the
bureau medical section, or fails to attend a medical examination scheduled under this section without
notice or explanation, the employee's application for a finding shall be dismissed without prejudice.
The employee may refile the application. A dismissed application does not toll the continuing
jurisdiction of the industrial commission under section 4123.52 of the Revised Code. The
administrator shall adopt rules addressing the manner in which an employee will be notified of a
possible dismissal and how an employee may refile an application for a determination.
The administrator shall notify the employee, the employer, and their representatives, in
writing, of the tentative order and of the parties' right to request a hearing. Unless the employee, the
employer, or their representative notifies the administrator, in writing, of an objection to the
tentative order within twenty days after receipt of the notice thereof, the tentative order shall go into
effect and the employee shall receive the compensation provided in the order. In no event shall there
be a reconsideration of a tentative order issued under this division.
If the employee, the employer, or their representatives timely notify the administrator of an
objection to the tentative order, the matter shall be referred to a district hearing officer who shall set
the application for hearing with written notices to all interested persons. Upon referral to a district
hearing officer, the employer may obtain a medical examination of the employee, pursuant to rules
of the industrial commission.

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
23
(A) The district hearing officer, upon the application, shall determine the percentage of the
employee's permanent disability, except as is subject to division (B) of this section, based upon that
condition of the employee resulting from the injury or occupational disease and causing permanent
impairment evidenced by medical or clinical findings reasonably demonstrable. The employee shall
receive sixty-six and two-thirds per cent of the employee's average weekly wage, but not more than
a maximum of thirty-three and one-third per cent of the statewide average weekly wage as defined in
division (C) of section 4123.62 of the Revised Code, per week regardless of the average weekly
wage, for the number of weeks which equals the percentage of two hundred weeks. Except on
application for reconsideration, review, or modification, which is filed within ten days after the date
of receipt of the decision of the district hearing officer, in no instance shall the former award be
modified unless it is found from medical or clinical findings that the condition of the claimant
resulting from the injury has so progressed as to have increased the percentage of permanent partial
disability. A staff hearing officer shall hear an application for reconsideration filed and the staff
hearing officer's decision is final. An employee may file an application for a subsequent
determination of the percentage of the employee's permanent disability. If such an application is
filed, the bureau shall send a copy of the application to the employer or the employer's
representative. No sooner than sixty days from the date of the mailing of the application to the
employer or the employer's representative, the administrator shall review the application. The
administrator may require a medical examination or medical review of the employee. The
administrator shall issue a tentative order based upon the evidence before the administrator, provided
that if the administrator requires a medical examination or medical review, the administrator shall
not issue the tentative order until the completion of the examination or review.
The employer may obtain a medical examination of the employee and may submit medical
evidence at any stage of the process up to a hearing before the district hearing officer, pursuant to
rules of the commission. The administrator shall notify the employee, the employer, and their
representatives, in writing, of the nature and amount of any tentative order issued on an application
requesting a subsequent determination of the percentage of an employee's permanent disability. An
employee, employer, or their representatives may object to the tentative order within twenty days
after the receipt of the notice thereof. If no timely objection is made, the tentative order shall go into
effect. In no event shall there be a reconsideration of a tentative order issued under this division. If
an objection is timely made, the application for a subsequent determination shall be referred to a
district hearing officer who shall set the application for a hearing with written notice to all interested
persons. No application for subsequent percentage determinations on the same claim for injury or
occupational disease shall be accepted for review by the district hearing officer unless supported by
substantial evidence of new and changed circumstances developing since the time of the hearing on
the original or last determination.
No award shall be made under this division based upon a percentage of disability which,
when taken with all other percentages of permanent disability, exceeds one hundred per cent. If the

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
24
percentage of the permanent disability of the employee equals or exceeds ninety per cent,
compensation for permanent partial disability shall be paid for two hundred weeks.
Compensation payable under this division accrues and is payable to the employee from the
date of last payment of compensation, or, in cases where no previous compensation has been paid,
from the date of the injury or the date of the diagnosis of the occupational disease.
When an award under this division has been made prior to the death of an employee, all
unpaid installments accrued or to accrue under the provisions of the award are payable to the
surviving spouse, or if there is no surviving spouse, to the dependent children of the employee, and
if there are no children surviving, then to other dependents as the administrator determines.
(B) For purposes of this division, "payable per week" means the seven-consecutive-day
period in which compensation is paid in installments according to the schedule associated with the
applicable injury as set forth in this division.
Compensation paid in weekly installments according to the schedule described in this
division may only be commuted to one or more lump sum payments pursuant to the procedure set
forth in section 4123.64 of the Revised Code.
In cases included in the following schedule the compensation payable per week to the
employee is the statewide average weekly wage as defined in division (C) of section 4123.62 of the
Revised Code per week and shall be paid in installments according to the following schedule:
For the loss of a first finger, commonly known as a thumb, sixty weeks.
For the loss of a second finger, commonly called index finger, thirty-five weeks.
For the loss of a third finger, thirty weeks.
For the loss of a fourth finger, twenty weeks.
For the loss of a fifth finger, commonly known as the little finger, fifteen weeks.
The loss of a second, or distal, phalange of the thumb is considered equal to the loss of one
half of such thumb; the loss of more than one half of such thumb is considered equal to the loss of
the whole thumb.
The loss of the third, or distal, phalange of any finger is considered equal to the loss of one-
third of the finger.
The loss of the middle, or second, phalange of any finger is considered equal to the loss of
two-thirds of the finger.
The loss of more than the middle and distal phalanges of any finger is considered equal to
the loss of the whole finger. In no case shall the amount received for more than one finger exceed
the amount provided in this schedule for the loss of a hand.
For the loss of the metacarpal bone (bones of the palm) for the corresponding thumb, or
fingers, add ten weeks to the number of weeks under this division.
For ankylosis (total stiffness of) or contractures (due to scars or injuries) which makes any of
the fingers, thumbs, or parts of either useless, the same number of weeks apply to the members or
parts thereof as given for the loss thereof.

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
25
If the claimant has suffered the loss of two or more fingers by amputation or ankylosis and
the nature of the claimant's employment in the course of which the claimant was working at the time
of the injury or occupational disease is such that the impairment or disability resulting from the loss
of fingers, or loss of use of fingers, exceeds the normal impairment or disability resulting from the
loss of fingers, or loss of use of fingers, the administrator may take that fact into consideration and
increase the award of compensation accordingly, but the award made shall not exceed the amount of
compensation for loss of a hand.
For the loss of a hand, one hundred seventy-five weeks.
For the loss of an arm, two hundred twenty-five weeks.
For the loss of a great toe, thirty weeks.
For the loss of one of the toes other than the great toe, ten weeks.
The loss of more than two-thirds of any toe is considered equal to the loss of the whole toe.
The loss of less than two-thirds of any toe is considered no loss, except as to the great toe;
the loss of the great toe up to the interphalangeal joint is co-equal to the loss of one-half of the great
toe; the loss of the great toe beyond the interphalangeal joint is considered equal to the loss of the
whole great toe.
For the loss of a foot, one hundred fifty weeks.
For the loss of a leg, two hundred weeks.
For the loss of the sight of an eye, one hundred twenty-five weeks.
For the permanent partial loss of sight of an eye, the portion of one hundred twenty-five
weeks as the administrator in each case determines, based upon the percentage of vision actually lost
as a result of the injury or occupational disease, but, in no case shall an award of compensation be
made for less than twenty-five per cent loss of uncorrected vision. "Loss of uncorrected vision"
means the percentage of vision actually lost as the result of the injury or occupational disease.
For the permanent and total loss of hearing of one ear, twenty-five weeks; but in no case
shall an award of compensation be made for less than permanent and total loss of hearing of one ear.
For the permanent and total loss of hearing, one hundred twenty-five weeks; but, except
pursuant to the next preceding paragraph, in no case shall an award of compensation be made for
less than permanent and total loss of hearing.
In case an injury or occupational disease results in serious facial or head disfigurement
which either impairs or may in the future impair the opportunities to secure or retain employment,
the administrator shall make an award of compensation as it deems proper and equitable, in view of
the nature of the disfigurement, and not to exceed the sum of ten thousand dollars. For the purpose
of making the award, it is not material whether the employee is gainfully employed in any
occupation or trade at the time of the administrator's determination.
When an award under this division has been made prior to the death of an employee all
unpaid installments accrued or to accrue under the provisions of the award shall be payable to the
surviving spouse, or if there is no surviving spouse, to the dependent children of the employee and if

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
26
there are no such children, then to such dependents as the administrator determines.
When an employee has sustained the loss of a member by severance, but no award has been
made on account thereof prior to the employee's death, the administrator shall make an award in
accordance with this division for the loss which shall be payable to the surviving spouse, or if there
is no surviving spouse, to the dependent children of the employee and if there are no such children,
then to such dependents as the administrator determines.
(C) Compensation for partial impairment under divisions (A) and (B) of this section is in
addition to the compensation paid the employee pursuant to section 4123.56 of the Revised Code. A
claimant may receive compensation under divisions (A) and (B) of this section.
In all cases arising under division (B) of this section, if it is determined by any one of the
following: (1) the amputee clinic at University hospital, Ohio state university; (2) the opportunities
for Ohioans with disabilities agency; (3) an amputee clinic or prescribing physician approved by the
administrator or the administrator's designee, that an injured or disabled employee is in need of an
artificial appliance, or in need of a repair thereof, regardless of whether the appliance or its repair
will be serviceable in the vocational rehabilitation of the injured employee, and regardless of
whether the employee has returned to or can ever again return to any gainful employment, the
bureau shall pay the cost of the artificial appliance or its repair out of the surplus created by division
(B) of section 4123.34 of the Revised Code.
Notwithstanding any provision in this division to the contrary, when a claimant has sustained
an amputation or a loss enumerated in division (B) of this section as a result of an injury or
occupational disease, the administrator shall pay the cost to purchase, repair, or replace a prosthetic
device as defined in division (B) of section 4123.52 from the surplus fund account created pursuant
to division (B) of section 4123.34 of the Revised Code, even if no award has been made under
division (B) of this section.
In those cases where an opportunities for Ohioans with disabilities agency's recommendation
that an injured or disabled employee is in need of an artificial appliance would conflict with their
state plan, adopted pursuant to the "Rehabilitation Act of 1973," 87 Stat. 355, 29 U.S.C.A. 701, the
administrator or the administrator's designee or the bureau may obtain a recommendation from an
amputee clinic or prescribing physician that they determine appropriate.
(D) If an employee of a state fund employer makes application for a finding and the
administrator finds that the employee has contracted silicosis as defined in division (Y), or coal
miners' pneumoconiosis as defined in division (Z), or asbestosis as defined in division (BB) of
section 4123.68 of the Revised Code, and that a change of such employee's occupation is medically
advisable in order to decrease substantially further exposure to silica dust, asbestos, or coal dust and
if the employee, after the finding, has changed or shall change the employee's occupation to an
occupation in which the exposure to silica dust, asbestos, or coal dust is substantially decreased, the
administrator shall allow to the employee an amount equal to fifty per cent of the statewide average
weekly wage per week for a period of thirty weeks, commencing as of the date of the discontinuance

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
27
or change, and for a period of one hundred weeks immediately following the expiration of the period
of thirty weeks, the employee shall receive sixty-six and two-thirds per cent of the loss of wages
resulting directly and solely from the change of occupation but not to exceed a maximum of an
amount equal to fifty per cent of the statewide average weekly wage per week. No such employee is
entitled to receive more than one allowance on account of discontinuance of employment or change
of occupation and benefits shall cease for any period during which the employee is employed in an
occupation in which the exposure to silica dust, asbestos, or coal dust is not substantially less than
the exposure in the occupation in which the employee was formerly employed or for any period
during which the employee may be entitled to receive compensation or benefits under section
4123.68 of the Revised Code on account of disability from silicosis, asbestosis, or coal miners'
pneumoconiosis. An award for change of occupation for a coal miner who has contracted coal
miners' pneumoconiosis may be granted under this division even though the coal miner continues
employment with the same employer, so long as the coal miner's employment subsequent to the
change is such that the coal miner's exposure to coal dust is substantially decreased and a change of
occupation is certified by the claimant as permanent. The administrator may accord to the employee
medical and other benefits in accordance with section 4123.66 of the Revised Code.
(E) If a firefighter or police officer makes application for a finding and the administrator
finds that the firefighter or police officer has contracted a cardiovascular and pulmonary disease as
defined in division (W) of section 4123.68 of the Revised Code, and that a change of the firefighter's
or police officer's occupation is medically advisable in order to decrease substantially further
exposure to smoke, toxic gases, chemical fumes, and other toxic vapors, and if the firefighter, or
police officer, after the finding, has changed or changes occupation to an occupation in which the
exposure to smoke, toxic gases, chemical fumes, and other toxic vapors is substantially decreased,
the administrator shall allow to the firefighter or police officer an amount equal to fifty per cent of
the statewide average weekly wage per week for a period of thirty weeks, commencing as of the date
of the discontinuance or change, and for a period of seventy-five weeks immediately following the
expiration of the period of thirty weeks the administrator shall allow the firefighter or police officer
sixty-six and two-thirds per cent of the loss of wages resulting directly and solely from the change of
occupation but not to exceed a maximum of an amount equal to fifty per cent of the statewide
average weekly wage per week. No such firefighter or police officer is entitled to receive more than
one allowance on account of discontinuance of employment or change of occupation and benefits
shall cease for any period during which the firefighter or police officer is employed in an occupation
in which the exposure to smoke, toxic gases, chemical fumes, and other toxic vapors is not
substantially less than the exposure in the occupation in which the firefighter or police officer was
formerly employed or for any period during which the firefighter or police officer may be entitled to
receive compensation or benefits under section 4123.68 of the Revised Code on account of disability
from a cardiovascular and pulmonary disease. The administrator may accord to the firefighter or
police officer medical and other benefits in accordance with section 4123.66 of the Revised Code.

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
28
(F) An order issued under this section is appealable pursuant to section 4123.511 of the
Revised Code but is not appealable to court under section 4123.512 of the Revised Code.
Sec. 4123.66. (A) In addition to the compensation provided for in this chapter, the
administrator of workers' compensation shall disburse and pay from the state insurance fund the
amounts for medical, nurse, and hospital services and medicine as the administrator deems proper
and, in case death ensues from the injury or occupational disease, the administrator shall disburse
and pay from the fund reasonable funeral expenses in an amount not to exceed seven thousand five
hundred dollars. The bureau of workers' compensation shall reimburse anyone, whether dependent,
volunteer, or otherwise, who pays the funeral expenses of any employee whose death ensues from
any injury or occupational disease as provided in this section. The administrator may adopt rules,
with the advice and consent of the bureau of workers' compensation board of directors, with respect
to furnishing medical, nurse, and hospital service and medicine to injured or disabled employees
entitled thereto, and for the payment therefor. In case an injury or industrial accident that injures an
employee also causes damage to the employee's eyeglasses, artificial teeth or other denture, or
hearing aid, or in the event an injury or occupational disease makes it necessary or advisable to
replace, repair, or adjust the same, the bureau shall disburse and pay a reasonable amount to repair or
replace the same.
(B) The administrator, in the rules the administrator adopts pursuant to division (A) of this
section, may adopt rules specifying the circumstances under which the bureau may make immediate
payment for the first fill of prescription drugs for medical conditions identified in an application for
compensation or benefits under section 4123.84 or 4123.85 of the Revised Code that occurs prior to
the date the administrator issues an initial determination order under division (B) of section
4123.511 of the Revised Code. If the claim is ultimately disallowed in a final administrative or
judicial order, and if the employer is a state fund employer who pays assessments into the surplus
fund account created under section 4123.34 of the Revised Code, the payments for medical services
made pursuant to this division for the first fill of prescription drugs shall be charged to and paid from
the surplus fund account and not charged through the state insurance fund to the employer against
whom the claim was filed.
(C)(1) If an employer or a welfare plan has provided to or on behalf of an employee any
benefits or compensation for an injury or occupational disease and that injury or occupational
disease is determined compensable under this chapter, the employer or a welfare plan may request
that the administrator reimburse the employer or welfare plan for the amount the employer or
welfare plan paid to or on behalf of the employee in compensation or benefits. The administrator
shall reimburse the employer or welfare plan for the compensation and benefits paid if, at the time
the employer or welfare plan provides the benefits or compensation to or on behalf of employee, the
injury or occupational disease had not been determined to be compensable under this chapter and if
the employee was not receiving compensation or benefits under this chapter for that injury or
occupational disease. The administrator shall reimburse the employer or welfare plan in the amount

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
29
that the administrator would have paid to or on behalf of the employee under this chapter if the
injury or occupational disease originally would have been determined compensable under this
chapter. If the employer is a merit-rated employer, the administrator shall adjust the amount of
premium next due from the employer according to the amount the administrator pays the employer.
The administrator shall adopt rules, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, to
implement this division.
(2) As used in this division, "welfare plan" has the same meaning as in division (1) of 29
U.S.C.A. 1002.
(D)(1) Subject to the requirements of division (D)(2) of this section, the administrator may
make a payment of up to five hundred dollars to either of the following:
(a) The centers of medicare and medicaid services, for reimbursement of conditional
payments made pursuant to the "Medicare Secondary Payer Act," 42 U.S.C. 1395y;
(b) The Ohio department of medicaid, or a medical assistance provider to whom the
department has assigned a right of recovery for a claim for which the department has notified the
provider that the department intends to recoup the department's prior payment for the claim, for
reimbursement under sections 5160.35 to 5160.43 of the Revised Code for the cost of medical
assistance paid on behalf of a medical assistance recipient.
(2) The administrator may make a payment under division (D)(1) of this section if the
administrator makes a reasonable determination that both all of the following apply:
(a) The payment is for reimbursement of benefits for an injury or occupational diseasein
response to a request from a party listed in division (D)(1) of this section.
(b) The There is an injury or occupational disease that is compensable, or is likely to be
compensable, under this chapter or Chapter 4121., 4127., or 4131. of the Revised Code.
(c) The payment will resolve the request from a party listed in division (D)(1) of this section.
(3) Any payment made pursuant to this division shall be charged to and paid from the
surplus fund account created under section 4123.34 of the Revised Code.
(4) Nothing in this division shall be construed as limiting the centers of medicare and
medicaid services, the department, or any other entity with a lawful right to reimbursement from
recovering sums greater than five hundred dollars.
(5) The administrator may adopt rules, with the advice and consent of the bureau of workers'
compensation board of directors, to implement this division.
Sec. 4125.07. (A) As used in this section, "self-insuring employer" has the same meaning as
in section 4123.01 of the Revised Code.
(B) Not later than thirty calendar days after the date on which a professional employer
organization agreement is terminated, the professional employer organization is adjudged bankrupt,
the professional employer organization ceases operations within the state of Ohio, or the registration
of the professional employer organization is revoked, the professional employer organization shall
submit to the administrator of workers' compensation and each client employer associated with that

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
30
professional employer organization a completed workers' compensation lease termination notice
form provided by the administrator. The If a professional employer organization is not a self-
insuring employer, the completed form shall include all client payroll and claim information listed in
a format specified by the administrator and notice of all workers' compensation claims that have
been reported to the professional employer organization in accordance with its internal reporting
policies.
(C)(1) If a professional employer organization that is a self-insuring employer is required to
submit a workers' compensation lease termination notice form under division (B) of this section, not
later than thirty calendar days after the lease termination the professional employer organization
shall submit all of the following to the administrator for any years necessary for the administrator to
develop a state fund experience modification factor for each client employer involved in the lease
termination:
(a) The payroll of each client employer involved in the lease termination, organized by
manual classification and year;
(b) The medical and indemnity costs of each client employer involved in the lease
termination, organized by claim;
(c) Any other information the administrator may require to develop a state fund experience
modification factor for each client employer involved in the lease termination.
(2) The administrator may require a professional employer organization to submit the
information required under division (C)(1) of this section at additional times after the initial
submission if the administrator determines that the information is necessary for the administrator to
develop a state fund experience modification factor.
(3) The administrator may revoke or refuse to renew a professional employer organization's
status as a self-insuring employer if the professional employer organization fails to provide
information requested by the administrator under division (C)(1) or (2) of this section.
(D) The administrator shall use the information provided under division (C) of this section to
develop a state fund experience modification factor for each client employer involved in a lease
termination with a professional employer organization that is a self-insuring employer.
(E)(C) A professional employer organization shall report any transfer of employees between
related professional employer organization entities or professional employer organization reporting
entities to the administrator within fourteen calendar days after the date of the transfer on a form
prescribed by the administrator. The If the professional employer organization is not a self-insuring
employer, the professional employer organization or professional employer organization reporting
entity shall include in the form all client payroll and claim information regarding the transferred
employees listed in a format specified by the administrator and a notice of all workers' compensation
claims that have been reported to the professional employer organization or professional employer
organization reporting entity in accordance with the internal reporting policies of the professional
employer organization or professional employer organization reporting entity.

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
31
(F) Prior to entering into a professional employer organization agreement with a client
employer, a professional employer organization shall disclose in writing to the client employer the
reporting requirements that apply to the professional employer organization under division (C) of
this section and that the administrator must develop a state fund experience modification factor for
each client employer involved in a lease termination with a professional employer organization that
is a self-insuring employer.
Sec. 4133.10. (A) As used in this section, "self-insuring employer" has the same meaning as
in section 4123.01 of the Revised Code.
(B) Not later than thirty calendar days after the date on which an alternate employer
organization agreement is terminated, the alternate employer organization is adjudged bankrupt, the
alternate employer organization ceases operations within the state of Ohio, or the registration of the
alternate employer organization is revoked, the alternate employer organization shall submit to the
administrator of workers' compensation and each client employer associated with that alternate
employer organization a completed workers' compensation lease termination notice form provided
by the administrator. The If an alternate employer organization is not a self-insuring employer, the
completed form shall include all client payroll and claim information listed in a format specified by
the administrator and notice of all workers' compensation claims that have been reported to the
alternate employer organization in accordance with its internal reporting policies.
(C)(1) If a alternate employer organization that is a self-insuring employer is required to
submit a workers' compensation lease termination notice form under division (B) of this section, not
later than thirty calendar days after the lease termination the alternate employer organization shall
submit all of the following to the administrator for any years necessary for the administrator to
develop a state fund experience modification factor for each client employer involved in the lease
termination:
(a) The payroll of each client employer involved in the lease termination, organized by
manual classification and year;
(b) The medical and indemnity costs of each client employer involved in the lease
termination, organized by claim;
(c) Any other information the administrator may require to develop a state fund experience
modification factor for each client employer involved in the lease termination.
(2) The administrator may require an alternate employer organization to submit the
information required under division (C)(1) of this section at additional times after the initial
submission if the administrator determines that the information is necessary for the administrator to
develop a state fund experience modification factor.
(3) The administrator may revoke or refuse to renew an alternate employer organization's
status as a self-insuring employer if the alternate employer organization fails to provide information
requested by the administrator under division (C)(1) or (2) of this section.
(D) The administrator shall use the information provided under division (C) of this section to

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
32
develop a state fund experience modification factor for each client employer involved in a lease
termination with an alternate employer organization that is a self-insuring employer.
(E)(C) An alternate employer organization shall report any transfer of employees between
related alternate employer organization entities to the administrator within fourteen calendar days
after the date of the transfer on a form prescribed by the administrator. The If the alternate employer
organization is not a self-insuring employer, the alternate employer organization shall include in the
form all client payroll and claim information regarding the transferred employees listed in a format
specified by the administrator and a notice of all workers' compensation claims that have been
reported to the alternate employer organization in accordance with the internal reporting policies of
the alternate employer organization.
(F) Prior to entering into an alternate employer organization agreement with a client
employer, an alternate employer organization shall disclose in writing to the client employer the
reporting requirements that apply to the alternate employer organization under division (C) of this
section and that the administrator must develop a state fund experience modification factor for each
client employer involved in a lease termination with an alternate employer organization that is a self-
insuring employer.
Sec. 4167.01. As used in this chapter:
(A) "Public employer" means any of the following:
(1) The state and its instrumentalities;
(2) Any political subdivisions and their instrumentalities, including any county, county
hospital, municipal corporation, city, village, township, park district, school district, state institution
of higher learning, public or special district, state agency, authority, commission, or board;
(3) Any other branch of public employment not mentioned in division (A)(1) or (2) of this
section.
(B) "Public employee" means any individual who engages to furnish services subject to the
direction and control of a public employer, including those individuals working for a private
employer who has contracted with a public employer and over whom the national labor relations
board has declined jurisdiction. "Public employee" does not mean any of the following:
(1) A peace officer employed by a public employer as defined in division (A)(2) of this
section or any member of the organized militia ordered to duty by state authority pursuant to Chapter
5923. of the Revised Code;
(2) Any person who engages to furnish services subject to the direction and control of a
public employer but does not receive compensation, either directly or indirectly, for those services;
(3) Any forest-fire investigator, natural resources officer, wildlife officer, or preserve officer;
(4) Any person incarcerated in an alternative residential facility, community-based
correctional facility, jail, halfway house, or prison, as those terms are defined in section 2929.01 of
the Revised Code.
(C) "Public employee representative" means an employee organization certified by the state

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
33
employment relations board under section 4117.05 of the Revised Code as the exclusive
representative of the public employees in a bargaining unit.
(D) "Employment risk reduction standard" means a standard which requires conditions, or
the adoption or use of one or more practices, means, methods, operations, or processes, reasonably
necessary or appropriate to provide safe and healthful employment and places of employment.
(E) "Ohio employment risk reduction standard" means any risk reduction standard adopted
or issued under this chapter.
(F) "Undue hardship" means any requirement imposed under this chapter or a rule or order
issued thereunder that would require a public employer to take an action with significant difficulty
or expense when considered in light of all of the following factors:
(1) The nature and cost of the action required under this chapter;
(2) The overall financial resources of the public employer involved in the action;
(3) The number of persons employed by the public employer at the particular location where
the action may be required;
(4) The effect on expenses and resources or the impact otherwise of the action required upon
the operations of the public employer at the location where the action may be required;
(5) The overall size of the public employer with respect to the number of its public
employees;
(6) The number, type, and location of the public employer's operations, including the
composition, structure, and functions of the workforce of the public entity;
(7) The geographic separateness, administrative, or fiscal relationship of the public
employer's operations to the whole public employer.
Sec. 4167.10. (A) In order to carry out the purposes of this chapter, the administrator of
workers' compensation or the administrator's designee shall, as provided in this section, enter
without delay during normal working hours and at other reasonable times, to inspect and investigate
any plant, facility, establishment, construction site, or any other area, workplace, or environment
where work is being performed by a public employee of a public employer, and any place of
employment and all pertinent conditions, structures, machines, apparatus, devices, equipment, and
materials therein, and question privately any public employer, administrator, department head,
operator, agent, or public employee. The authority to inspect and investigate includes the taking of
environmental samples, the taking and obtaining of photographs related to the purposes of the
inspection or investigation, the examination of records required to be kept under section 4167.11 of
the Revised Code and other documents and records relevant to the inspection and investigation, the
issuance of subpoenas, and the conducting of tests and other studies reasonably calculated to serve
the purposes of implementing and enforcing this chapter. Except as provided in this section, the
administrator or the administrator's designee shall conduct scheduled the inspections and
investigations only pursuant to rules adopted under section 4167.02 of the Revised Code, a request
to do so by a public employee or public employee representative, or the notification the

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
34
administrator receives pursuant to division (B) of section 4167.06 of the Revised Code and only if
the administrator or the administrator's designee complies with this section. The administrator or the
administrator's designee shall conduct all requested or required inspections within a reasonable
amount of time following receipt of the request or notification.
(B)(1) Any public employee or public employee representative who believes that a violation
of an Ohio employment risk reduction standard exists that threatens physical harm, or that an
imminent danger exists, may request an inspection by giving written notice to the administrator or
the administrator's designee of the violation or danger. The notice shall set forth with reasonable
particularity the grounds for the notice, and shall be signed by the public employee or public
employee representative. The names of individual public employees making the notice or referred to
therein shall not appear in the copy provided to the public employer pursuant to division (B)(2) of
this section and shall be kept confidential.
(2) If, upon receipt of a notification pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section, the
administrator determines that there are no reasonable grounds to believe that a violation or danger
exists, the administrator shall inform the public employee or public employee representative in
writing of the determination. If, upon receipt of a notification, the administrator determines that
there are reasonable grounds to believe that a violation or danger exists, the administrator shall,
within one week, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and any legal holiday as defined in section 1.14 of
the Revised Code, after receipt of the notification, notify the public employer, by certified mail,
return receipt requested, of the alleged violation or danger. The notice provided to the public
employer or the public employer's agent shall inform the public employer of the alleged violation or
danger and that the administrator or the administrator's designee will investigate and inspect the
public employer's workplace as provided in this section. The public employer must respond to the
administrator, in a method determined by the administrator, concerning the alleged violation or
danger, within thirty days after receipt of the notice. If the public employer does not correct the
violation or danger within the thirty-day period or if the public employer fails to respond within that
time period, the administrator or the administrator's designee shall investigate and inspect the public
employer's workplace as provided in this section. The administrator or the administrator's designee
shall not conduct any inspection prior to the end of the thirty-day period unless requested or
permitted by the public employer. The administrator may, at any time upon the request of the public
employer, inspect and investigate any violation or danger alleged to exist at the public employer's
place of employment.
(3) The authority of the administrator or the administrator's designee to investigate and
inspect a premises pursuant to a public employee or public employee representative notification is
not limited to the alleged violation or danger contained in the notification. The administrator or the
administrator's designee may investigate and inspect any other area of the premises where there is
reason to believe that a violation or danger exists. In addition, if the administrator or the
administrator's designee detects any obvious or apparent violation at any temporary place of

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
35
employment while en route to the premises to be inspected or investigated, and that violation
presents a substantial probability that the condition or practice could result in death or serious
physical harm, the administrator or the administrator's designee may use any of the enforcement
mechanisms provided in this section to correct or remove the condition or practice.
(4) If, during an inspection or investigation, the administrator or the administrator's designee
finds any condition or practice in any place of employment that presents a substantial probability
that the condition or practice could result in death or serious physical harm, after notifying the
employer of the administrator's intent to issue an order, the administrator shall issue an order, or the
administrator's designee shall issue an order after consultation with the administrator and upon the
recommendation of the administrator, which prohibits the employment of any public employee or
any continuing operation or process under such condition or practice until necessary steps are taken
to correct or remove the condition or practice. The order shall not be effective for more than fifteen
days, unless a court of competent jurisdiction otherwise orders as provided in section 4167.14 of the
Revised Code.
(C) In making any inspections or investigations under this chapter, the administrator or the
administrator's designee may administer oaths and require, by subpoena, the attendance and
testimony of witnesses and the production of evidence under oath. Witnesses shall receive the fees
and mileage provided for under section 119.094 of the Revised Code. In the case of contumacy,
failure, or refusal of any person to comply with an order or any subpoena lawfully issued, or upon
the refusal of any witness to testify to any matter regarding which the witness may lawfully be
interrogated, a judge of the court of common pleas of any county in this state, on the application of
the administrator or the administrator's designee, shall issue an order requiring the person to appear
and to produce evidence if, as, and when so ordered, and to give testimony relating to the matter
under investigation or in question. The court may punish any failure to obey the order of the court as
a contempt thereof.
(D) If, upon inspection or investigation, the administrator or the administrator's designee
believes that a public employer has violated any requirement of this chapter or any rule, Ohio
employment risk reduction standard, or order adopted or issued pursuant thereto, the administrator
or the administrator's designee shall, with reasonable promptness, issue a citation to the public
employer. The citation shall be in writing and describe with particularity the nature of the alleged
violation, including a reference to the provision of law, Ohio employment risk reduction standard,
rule, or order alleged to have been violated. In addition, the citation shall fix a time for the
abatement of the violation, as provided in division (H) of this section. The administrator may
prescribe procedures for the issuance of a notice with respect to minor violations and for
enforcement of minor violations that have no direct or immediate relationship to safety or health.
(E) Upon receipt of any citation under this section, the public employer shall immediately
post the citation, or a copy thereof, at or near each place an alleged violation referred to in the
citation occurred.

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
36
(F) The administrator may not issue a citation under this section after the expiration of six
months following the final occurrence of any violation.
(G) If the administrator issues a citation pursuant to this section, the administrator shall mail
the citation to the public employer by certified mail, return receipt requested. The public employer
has fourteen days after receipt of the citation within which to notify the administrator that the
employer wishes to contest the citation. If the employer notifies the administrator within the fourteen
days that the employer wishes to contest the citation, or if within fourteen days after the issuance of
a citation a public employee or public employee representative files notice that the time period fixed
in the citation for the abatement of the violation is unreasonable, the administrator shall hold an
adjudication hearing in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code.
(H) In establishing the time limits in which a public employer must abate a violation under
this section, the administrator shall consider the costs to the public employer, the size and financial
resources of the public employer, the severity of the violation, the technological feasibility of the
public employer's ability to comply with requirements of the citation, the possible present and future
detriment to the health and safety of any public employee for failure of the public employer to
comply with requirements of the citation, and such other factors as the administrator determines
appropriate. The administrator may, after considering the above factors, permit the public employer
to comply with the citation over a period of up to two years and may extend that period an additional
one year, as the administrator determines appropriate.
(I) Any public employer may request the administrator to conduct an employment risk
reduction inspection of the public employer's place of employment. The administrator or the
administrator's designee shall conduct the inspection within a reasonable amount of time following
the request. Neither the administrator nor any other person may use any information obtained from
the inspection for a period not to exceed three years in any proceeding for a violation of this chapter
or any rule or order issued thereunder nor in any other action in any court in this state.
Sec. 5145.163. (A) As used in this section:
(1) "Customer model enterprise" means an enterprise conducted under a federal prison
industries enhancement certification program in which a private party participates in the enterprise
only as a purchaser of goods and services.
(2) "Employer model enterprise" means an enterprise conducted under a federal prison
industries enhancement certification program in which a private party participates in the enterprise
as an operator of the enterprise.
(3) "Injury" and "occupational disease" have the same meanings as in section 4123.01 of the
Revised Code if sustained or contracted in the course of, and arising out of, participation in
authorized work activity in the federal prison industries enhancement certification program.
(4) "Inmate""Incarcerated worker" means any person who is committed to the custody of the
department of rehabilitation and correction and who is participating in an Ohio penal industries
program that is under the federal prison industries enhancement certification program.

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
37
(5) "Federal prison industries enhancement certification program" means the program
authorized pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 1761.
(6) "Injured incarcerated worker" means an individual to which division (G) of this section
applies.
(7) "Compensation" means compensation as provided in sections 4123.56 to 4123.58 of the
Revised Code.
(B) No private party shall participate in an employer model enterprise in this state unless the
private party is approved by the director of rehabilitation and correction in accordance with division
(C) of this section.
(C) The director may approve a private party to participate in an employer model enterprise
only if the private party meets the following requirements:
(1) The private party provides proof of workers' compensation coverage furnished by the
bureau of workers' compensation.
(2) The private party carries liability insurance in an amount the director determines to be
sufficient.
(3)(2) The private party does not have an unresolved finding for recovery by the auditor of
state under section 9.24 of the Revised Code.
(D)(1) If the enterprise for which an inmate works is a customer model enterprise, the (D)
The department may shall treat the inmate an incarcerated worker, regardless of whether the
incarcerated worker works in a customer model enterprise or an employer model enterprise, as an
employee of the department for the purpose of workers' compensation coverage in accordance with
Chapters 4121., and 4123., 4127., and 4131. of the Revised Code.
(2) If the enterprise for which an inmate works is an employer model enterprise, the private
participant may treat the inmate as an employee of the private participant for the purpose of workers'
compensation coverage in accordance with Chapters 4121., 4123., 4127., and 4131. of the Revised
Code.
(E) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, inmates incarcerated workers are not
employees of the department of rehabilitation and correction or the private participant in an
enterprise.
(F)(1) An inmate incarcerated worker who is injured or who contracts an occupational
disease in the course of and arising out of participation in authorized work activity in the federal
prison industries enhancement certification program may request the department file a claim for
compensation or benefits with the bureau of workers' compensation under Chapters 4121., and
4123., 4127., and 4131. of the Revised Code while the claimant is in the custody of the department
within the timeframe provided for in section 4123.84 or 4123.85 of the Revised Code.
(2) The dependent of an inmate incarcerated worker who is killed or dies as the result of an
injury or occupational disease contracted in the course of and arising out of participation in
authorized work activity in the federal prison industries enhancement certification program may

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
38
request the department file a claim for compensation and benefits with the bureau under Chapters
4121., and 4123., 4127., and 4131. of the Revised Code within the timeframe provided for in section
4123.84 or 4123.85 of the Revised Code. A party may use the appeals process under Chapters 4121.
and 4123. of the Revised Code regarding applications filed under division (F)(2) of this section.
(G) Notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 4121. or 4123. of the Revised Code to the
contrary, an inmate who files a claim pursuant to this sectionif the department determines that an
incarcerated worker was injured or contracted an occupational disease in the course of and arising
out of participation in authorized work activity in the federal prison industries enhancement
certification program, whether by external accidental means or accidental in character or result, both
of the following apply to the individual while that individual is in the custody of the department:
(1) The individual may receive medical treatment for the injury or occupational disease.
(2) The individual is barred from filing for compensation with the department or the bureau.
shall receive (H) While an injured incarcerated worker is in the custody of the department,
medical recommendations pertaining to, and medical treatment and have medical determinations for
purposes of Chapter 4121. and 4123. of the Revised Code made by the department's medical
providersfor, the injured incarcerated worker shall be provided exclusively through the department's
network of providers. Medical
(I) Claim allowance determinations made by the department's providers department shall be
limited to initial claim allowances and requests for additional conditions. The claimant An injured
incarcerated worker may request appeal the department's claim allowance determination or medical
treatment determination by requesting a review by the department's chief medical officer. In the
event of an a further appeal, the claimant injured incarcerated worker may receive a medical
evaluation from a medical practitioner affiliated within the department's network of third-party
medical contractors or a medical practitioner in a managed care organization certified by the bureau
of workers' compensation under section 4121.44 of the Revised Code and located in Franklin
county.
(H) In (J) Except for appeals regarding determinations under division (I) of this section, and
notwithstanding any provision of Chapter 4121. or 4123. of the Revised Code to the contrary, an
injured incarcerated worker is barred from appealing a determination made under this section while
incarcerated.
(K) After an injured incarcerated worker is released from incarceration, all of the following
apply:
(1) A party may use the appeals process under Chapters 4121. and 4123. of the Revised
Code regarding any application filed by an injured incarcerated worker.
(2) The released individual may receive medical treatment consistent with Chapters 4121.
and 4123. of the Revised Code.
(3) The released individual may seek compensation through the bureau consistent with
Chapters 4121. and 4123. of the Revised Code.

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
39
(L) Except for medical treatment as allowed under division (G) of this section, in accordance
with division (J) of section 4123.54 of the Revised Code, compensation or medical benefits are not
payable to or on behalf of a claimant an injured incarcerated worker during the period of
confinement of the claimant injured incarcerated worker in any correctional institution or county jail.
Any remaining amount of an award of compensation or benefits for an injury or occupational
disease arising out of participation in authorized work activity in the federal prison industries
enhancement certification program shall be paid to or on behalf of a claimant after the claimant is
released from imprisonment. If a claimant an injured incarcerated worker is reimprisoned within the
custody of the department, compensation and benefits shall be suspended during the claimant's
injured incarcerated worker's imprisonment but shall may resume on the claimant's worker's release
from imprisonment. The department may pay for medical benefits in accordance with division (G)
of this section.
(I)(M) After an injured incarcerated worker is released from the department's custody,
regardless of whether the worker worked in a customer model enterprise or an employer model
enterprise, all claim costs, other than medical costs paid by the department while the worker was in
the department's custody, shall be paid by the department in accordance with the requirements of
Chapters 4121. and 4123. of the Revised Code.
(N) An inmate incarcerated worker shall voluntarily consent to participate in a federal prison
industries enhancement certification program prior to commencing participation in the program.
Such consent disclaims the inmate's worker's ability to choose a medical provider while the inmate
worker is imprisoned and subjects the inmate worker to the requirements of this section.
S 2. That existing sections 4121.12, 4121.121, 4121.13, 4123.44, 4123.52, 4123.54,
ECTION
4123.57, 4123.66, 4125.07, 4133.10, 4167.01, 4167.10, and 5145.163 of the Revised Code are
hereby repealed.
S 3. That sections 4167.25, 4167.27, and 4167.28 of the Revised Code are hereby
ECTION
repealed.
S 4. All items in this act are hereby appropriated out of any moneys in the state
ECTION
treasury to the credit of the designated fund. For all appropriations made in this act, those in the first
column are for fiscal year 2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027.
1 2 3 4 5
A BWC BUREAU OF WORKERS COMPENSATION

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
40
B Dedicated Purpose Fund Group
C 7023 855407 Claims, Risk and Medical $123,887,269 $128,050,202
Management
D 7023 855409 Administrative Services $167,215,851 $168,637,822
E 7023 855410 Attorney General Payments $6,384,084 $6,607,527
F 8220 855606 Coal Workers' Fund $197,040 $197,040
G 8230 855608 Marine Industry $75,000 $75,000
H 8250 855605 Disabled Workers Relief Fund $201,000 $201,000
I 8260 855609 Safety and Hygiene Operating $21,471,244 $23,281,721
J 8260 855610 Safety Grants $41,300,000 $41,300,000
K 8260 855611 Health and Safety Initiative $3,000,000 $3,000,000
L 8260 855612 Safety Campaign $250,000 $250,000
M 8260 855619 Safety and Health Workforce $14,700,000 $14,700,000
Safety Innovation Center
N Dedicated Purpose Fund Group Total $378,681,488 $386,300,312
O Federal Fund Group
P 3490 855601 OSHA Enforcement $1,751,293 $1,751,293
Q 3FW 855614 BLS SOII Grant $199,000 $199,000
0
R Federal Fund Group Total $1,950,293 $1,950,293
S TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $380,631,781 $388,250,605
S 5. WORKERS' COMPENSATION FRAUD UNIT
ECTION

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
41
Of the foregoing appropriation item 855410, Attorney General Payments, $869,610 in fiscal
year 2026 and $900,046 in fiscal year 2027 shall be used to fund the expenses of the Workers'
Compensation Fraud Unit within the Attorney General's Office. These payments shall be processed
at the beginning of each quarter of each fiscal year and deposited into the Workers' Compensation
Section Fund (Fund 1950) used by the Attorney General.
SAFETY AND HYGIENE
Notwithstanding section 4121.37 of the Revised Code, as directed by the Bureau of Workers'
Compensation, the Treasurer of State shall remit up to $80,721,244 cash in fiscal year 2026 and up
to $82,531,721 cash in fiscal year 2027 from the State Insurance Fund to the state treasury to the
credit of the Safety and Hygiene Fund (Fund 8260) to be used to fund appropriation lines 855609 for
the purpose of operating a Safety and Hygiene program, 855610 to be used for Safety Grants,
855611 for the purpose of operating a Health and Wellness Program, 855612 for the purpose of
operating a statewide safety awareness and education campaign, and 855619 for the purpose of
funding a workforce safety innovation center program.
FEDERAL GRANT PROGRAMS
The foregoing appropriation item 855609, Safety and Hygiene Operating, may be used to
provide the state match for federal grant funding received by the Division of Safety and Hygiene.
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION
The Bureau of Workers' Compensation and the Opportunities for Ohioans with Disabilities
Agency may enter into an interagency agreement for the provision of vocational rehabilitation
services and staff to mutually eligible clients. The Bureau may provide funds from the State
Insurance Fund to fund vocational rehabilitation services and staff in accordance with the
interagency agreement.
S 6. DEPUTY INSPECTOR GENERAL FOR BWC AND OIC FUNDING
ECTION
To pay for the FY 2026 costs related to the Deputy Inspector General for the Bureau of
Workers' Compensation and Industrial Commission, on July 1, 2025, and January 1, 2026, or as soon
as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $212,500 cash from the
Workers' Compensation Fund (Fund 7023) to the Deputy Inspector General for the Bureau of
Workers' Compensation and Industrial Commission Fund (Fund 5FT0).
To pay for the FY 2027 costs related to the Deputy Inspector General for the Bureau of
Workers' Compensation and Industrial Commission, on July 1, 2026, and January 1, 2027, or as soon
as possible thereafter, the Director of Budget and Management shall transfer $212,500 cash from the
Workers' Compensation Fund (Fund 7023) to the Deputy Inspector General for the Bureau of
Workers' Compensation and Industrial Commission Fund (Fund 5FT0).
If additional amounts are needed, the Inspector General may seek Controlling Board
approval for additional transfers of cash and to increase the amount appropriated in appropriation
item 965604, Deputy Inspector General for the Bureau of Workers' Compensation and Industrial

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
42
Commission.
S 7. The amendment of sections 4123.52 and 4123.57 of the Revised Code by this act
ECTION
applies to claims pending on or arising on or after the effective date of this section.
S 8. This Section and Sections 4, 5, and 6 of this act are exempt from the referendum
ECTION
under Ohio Constitution, Article II, Section 1d and section 1.471 of the Revised Code and therefore
take effect immediately when this act becomes law.
S 9. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section
ECTION
1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of
simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the
sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to
the effective date of the sections as presented in this act:
Section 4123.52 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 33 of the 135th General
Assembly and H.B. 81 of the 133rd General Assembly.
Section 4123.57 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 75 and H.B. 281 of the 134th
General Assembly.

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives.
President ___________________ of the Senate.
Passed ________________________, 20____
Approved ________________________, 20____
Governor.

Am. H. B. No. 81 136th G.A.
The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is
complete and in conformity with the Revised Code.
Director, Legislative Service Commission.
Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____
day of ___________, A. D. 20____.
Secretary of State.
File No. _________ Effective Date ___________________